Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Liability

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 34 to 125, 186 to 215.

Modern status of test of criminal responsibility — state cases, 9 ALR4th 526.

Prosecution of female as principal for rape, 67 ALR4th 1127.

22 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 96 to 113, 127 to 148.

§ 6-1-201.
Accessory before the fact.

A person who knowingly aids or abets in the commission of a felony, or who counsels, encourages, hires, commands or procures a felony to be committed, is an accessory before the fact.

An accessory before the fact:

May be indicted, informed against, tried and convicted as if he were a principal;

May be indicted, informed against, tried and convicted either before or after and whether or not the principal offender is indicted, informed against, tried or convicted; and

Upon conviction, is subject to the same punishment and penalties as are prescribed by law for the punishment of the principal.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Constitutionality.

Wyoming's mandatory identical sentencing structure for accessory and principal actors in felony murder, which imposed a mandatory life sentence, did not violate the Eighth Amendment when applied to juveniles given federal judicial precedent that refrained from extending those protections to accomplices. Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113, 334 P.3d 132,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2014).

This section creates a separate and distinct offense from that of the principal.

Linn v. State, 505 P.2d 1270,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 411 U.S. 983, 93 S. Ct. 2277, 36 L. Ed. 2d 959, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 2437 (U.S. 1973). See also Goldsmith v. Cheney, 447 F.2d 624,

1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 8271

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Jurisdiction exists if felony occurs within this state. —

Former statutory language, “may be tried and convicted in the same manner as if he were a principal,” granted Wyoming jurisdiction if the felony occurred here regardless of where the accessorial acts took place. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

The decision in Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982), restricting the holding in Goldsmith v. Cheney, 468 P.2d 813,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1970), overruled on other grounds, Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), did not violate the ex posto facto clause of the United States constitution. Hopkinson v. Shillinger, 645 F. Supp. 374, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21918 (D. Wyo. 1986), aff'd in part, 866 F.2d 1185,

1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 613

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1989).

Or any accessorial acts. —

This state has jurisdiction over an accessory before the fact if any accessorial acts occurred in Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982). See also Goldsmith v. Cheney, 468 P.2d 813,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1970).

Elements of aiding and abetting. —

To convict one of aiding and abetting the commission of a substantive offense, it is necessary to prove that the crime in question was committed by someone and that the person charged as an aider and abettor associated himself and participated in the accomplishment and success of the criminal venture. Goldsmith v. Cheney, 447 F.2d 624,

1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 8271

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1971); Hawkes v. State, 626 P.2d 1041,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1981); Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982).

Test is whether participant could be charged with principal's offense. —

The test for determining whether the acts of a participant in a crime constitute those of an accomplice is whether or not the participant could also be charged with the identical offense as that committed by the principal. Wheeler v. State, 691 P.2d 599,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1984).

Agreement or understanding not required. —

The terms aiding, abetting and counseling do not presuppose the existence of an agreement. Goldsmith v. Cheney, 447 F.2d 624, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 8271 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

If two persons engaged in a crime are aiding or abetting each other in what they do, a previous understanding is not necessary to be shown in order to render each of them accountable for the other's acts. Espy v. State, 54 Wyo. 291, 92 P.2d 549,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1939); Lujan v. State, 423 P.2d 388,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1967).

A “concert of action” does not necessitate actual words or written compact. Borrego v. State, 423 P.2d 393,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1967).

Accomplice and principal need not have identical intents. —

A defendant must share the criminal intent of the principal if he is to be found guilty as an aider and abettor, but the law does not require that the defendant possess the identical intent as the principal. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

And may be charged and convicted of different degrees of offense. —

One who aids and abets in a homicide can be charged with and convicted of a greater or a lesser degree of offense than the principal, depending upon the mental set established at trial. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Criminal intent provable by relationship of parties and by joint conduct. —

Although a defendant's presence at the time and place of the crime does not establish guilt as an aider, abettor or principal, an intent to engage in the criminal venture may be shown by the relationship of the parties and by their conduct before and after the offense. Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982).

Showing of defendants' association in acts comprising each element of offense sufficient. —

It is not necessary to prove that each defendant did that which was necessary to establish each element of an offense: it is sufficient to show that they were associated together in doing that which comprises each element of the offense. Edge v. State, 647 P.2d 557,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1982).

Thief as accessory to receiving stolen property. —

A thief stealing property may, under a proper state of facts, be an accessory of the person charged with receiving that stolen property. State v. Callaway, 72 Wyo. 509, 267 P.2d 970,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1954).

Homicide during commission of robbery by two or more persons. —

If two or more persons are jointly engaged in the perpetration of or an attempt to perpetrate a robbery, and a human being is killed during its commission by any one of the persons so jointly engaged, then each of the offenders are equally guilty of the homicide. Jones v. State, 568 P.2d 837,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1977).

Duties as lookout constitute one aider and abettor. —

Keeping watch while a crime is being perpetrated so as to facilitate the escape of a party actually committing it or to prevent the party from being interrupted is an aiding and abetting which constitutes a defendant/lookout a principal. Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982).

Arranging transaction constituted aiding and abetting of delivery. —

Although third party actually accomplished delivery of controlled substance when she gave bag of marijuana to undercover agent, defendant aided and abetted the delivery by taking the money from the agent and arranging the transaction. Simmons v. State, 687 P.2d 255,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1984).

Purchaser of narcotics is not accomplice of defendant charged with selling

such narcotics. Wheeler v. State, 691 P.2d 599,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1984).

Counseling and encouraging sufficient to prove offense. —

Where victim testified that mother counseled and encouraged victim to have sexual relations with mother's boyfriend, evidence was clear that mother aided and abetted boyfriend in the commission of his crime. Kavanaugh v. State, 769 P.2d 908,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1989).

Lesser-included offenses. —

The offense of aiding and abetting voluntary manslaughter is a lesser included offense of aiding and abetting first degree murder. Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Offense of conspiracy not identical. —

The offense of conspiracy and of accessory before the fact are not identical in law or in fact. Goldsmith v. Cheney, 447 F.2d 624, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 8271 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Offense described in §

12-6-101

distinguished. —

The “minor in possession” offense described in subsection (b) of §

12-6-101

is not the same offense as “accessory before the fact” to larceny of whiskey under this section and §

6-3-402

, nor does it merge into or become an included offense. Mullin v. State, 505 P.2d 305,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 940, 94 S. Ct. 245, 38 L. Ed. 2d 166, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1063 (U.S. 1973).

Misdemeanors. —

This section does not cover misdemeanors, and under common-law rule there are no accessories to misdemeanors. State v. Weekley, 40 Wyo. 162, 275 P. 122,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1929).

Mental disorders, absent reduced capacity, no excuse. —

A showing that the defendant was suffering from bipolar affective disorder, schizoaffective disorder and other maladies was insufficient to excuse him from the crime of accessory to first-degree murder, where he did not show that, because of this mental condition, he lacked substantial capacity either to appreciate the wrongfulness of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law. Miller v. State, 755 P.2d 855,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1988), cert. denied, 806 P.2d 1308,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1991).

Information need not refer to this section. —

Proof of participation as an aider and abettor is sufficient to convict a defendant as a principal and it is not necessary for a conviction that the information upon which the defendant is charged refer to this section. Hawkes v. State, 626 P.2d 1041,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1981).

Indictment adequately charged aiding and abetting. —

See Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Instructions. —

Where evidence justified inference that defendants, who were together, acted in pursuance of design, instruction that if deceased was assaulted by defendants in pursuance of design or understanding to kill or seriously injure deceased, each is responsible for acts of the other in carrying out such design, was not error. Espy v. State, 54 Wyo. 291, 92 P.2d 549,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1939).

Instruction on aiding and abetting, that it is not possible for a defendant to ever participate in a mere attempt to commit a crime and to do so knowingly and willfully with a specific intent, has no merit. Martinez v. State, 511 P.2d 105,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1973).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's conviction for accessory before the fact to burglary of junior high school. See Fales v. State, 908 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1995).

Death penalty for accessory to murder. —

The moral guilt and personal responsibility of one who commands another to commit murder, and is therefore an accessory before the fact, justifies the death penalty. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Conditional guilty plea not permissible, although admissible in trial of aider and abettor. —

A plea of guilty to possession with intent to deliver a controlled substance, with the express reservation of the right to appeal the constitutional issues arising from the search of the defendant's premises, was not permissible. Because of this, the case was reversed and remanded to the district court for the taking of a proper plea. However, since the parties intended the defendant's stipulation to be a waiver of the necessity for the prosecution, in the trial of another charged with aiding and abetting, to establish the elements of the substantive offense, or to be an admission of the violation and to be so considered as part of the evidence, the conditional guilty plea did not alter the status or aspect of what occurred at the trial of the aider and abettor, where, although no evidence, other than the guilty plea, was introduced as to a link between the substance seized and the defendant's intent, the aider and abettor was properly convicted. Tompkins v. State, 705 P.2d 836,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1985), cert. denied, 475 U.S. 1052, 106 S. Ct. 1277, 89 L. Ed. 2d 585, 1986 U.S. LEXIS 659 (U.S. 1986).

Applied

in

Fullmer v. Meacham, 387 P.2d 1007,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1964); Linn v. State, 505 P.2d 1270,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1973); Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976); Jacobs v. State, 641 P.2d 197,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1982); Eaton v. State, 660 P.2d 803,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1983); Black v. State, 2002 WY 72, 46 P.3d 298,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983); Smith v. State, 880 P.2d 573,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1994); Paugh v. State, 9 P.3d 973,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2000)Yellowbear v. State, 2008 WY 4, 174 P.3d 1270,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Jan. 14, 2008).

Stated

in

State v. Vines, 49 Wyo. 212, 54 P.2d 826,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1936); Lozano v. State, 751 P.2d 1326,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

CSC v. State, 2005 WY 106, 118 P.3d 970,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Aug 30, 2005)Berry v. State, 51 Wyo. 249, 65 P.2d 1097,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1937); Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974); Evans v. State, 653 P.2d 308,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1982); Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986); Reynoldson v. State, 737 P.2d 1331,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1987); Birr v. State, 744 P.2d 1117,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 528

(Wyo. 1987); Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Duffy v. State, 837 P.2d 1047,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1992); Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995); Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003); Cureton v. State, 2007 WY 168, 169 P.3d 549,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Oct. 24, 2007); Patterson v. State, 2013 WY 153, 314 P.3d 759,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 159

, 2013 WL 6665023 (Dec 18, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions? Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accessory before fact in manslaughter, 95 ALR2d 175.

Acquittal of principal, or his conviction of lesser degree of offense, as affecting prosecution of accessory, or aider and abettor, 9 ALR4th 972.

Criminal liability for death of another as result of accused's attempt to kill self or assist another's suicide, 40 ALR4th 702.

Sufficiency of evidence of instigating or assisting escape from federal custody, under 18 USCS § 752(a), 74 ALR Fed 816.

§ 6-1-202.
Being under the influence not a defense; effect upon intent; “self-induced.”

Self-induced intoxication of the defendant is not a defense to a criminal charge except to the extent that in any prosecution evidence of self-induced intoxication of the defendant may be offered when it is relevant to negate the existence of a specific intent which is an element of the crime.

Intoxication is self-induced if it is caused by substances which the defendant knows or ought to know have the tendency to cause intoxication and which he knowingly and voluntarily introduced or allowed to be introduced into his body unless they were introduced pursuant to medical advice. The fact that the defendant is dependent upon the intoxicating substance is not relevant in determining whether his intoxication is self-induced.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

To claim insanity on account of drunkenness is equivalent to claiming absence of intent

on account of drunkenness. Rice v. State, 500 P.2d 675,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1972).

Voluntary intoxication not negating specific intent. —

Evidence was sufficient to support the jury's findings that there was a conspiracy to commit aggravated assault and battery and that defendant acted with specific intent; although the plan to beat up a third person may have been crude and ill-conceived and entered into only after a long drinking bout, there was evidence that the “plan” to beat up a business owner using an axe handle rose to the level of a conspiracy, and that defendant acted with specific intent to further the plan. Hankinson v. State, 2002 WY 86, 47 P.3d 623,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2002).

District court properly convicted defendant of first-degree arson because, while he claimed that his intoxication excused his actions, he intentionally set fire in a store while it was occupied by customers and employees, he admitted to police that he started the fire because he was angry about the store's customer service, he had to make decisions and take actions that required some presence of mind, witnesses who spoke to him stated that he spoke clearly before and after he started the fire, he told his mother to say he was drunk when he started the fire, and the State presented evidence that he was not intoxicated to a level that prevented him from knowing what he was doing. Harnden v. State, 2016 WY 92, 378 P.3d 611,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2016).

Voluntary intoxication negating specific intent. —

Intoxication is no excuse for crime, but should be considered as affecting defendant's mental condition, with reference to his capability of a specific intent. Cook v. Territory, 3 Wyo. 110, 4 P. 887,

1884 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1884).

Where specific intent is a necessary element of the crime in question, the defendant is entitled to instructions that evidence of voluntary intoxication may be considered for the purpose of negativing the state of mind necessary to commit a specific intent crime. Brown v. State, 590 P.2d 1312,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1979).

But voluntary intoxication no defense to general intent crime.—

Voluntary intoxication is not a defense to a crime requiring only a general intent. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

During defendant's trial for felony interference with a peace officer, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b), the court did not err in refusing to instruct the jury on a self-induced intoxication defense because the completed offense described in § 6-5-204(b) was a general intent crime and thus the self-induced intoxication defense was not available.
Mowery v. State, 2011 WY 38, 247 P.3d 866,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2011).

Thus in first-degree murder, voluntary intoxication is defense

as its effects bear upon the ability of the accused to formulate the premeditated malice requisite to the commission of the crime. Goodman v. State, 573 P.2d 400,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1977).

Unless evidence of preexisting premeditation. —

Where at the time of the homicide accused was so drunk as to be incapable of forming a deliberate intent, murder in the first degree would not be proven without evidence of his having premeditated the crime prior to his becoming intoxicated. Gustavenson v. State, 10 Wyo. 300, 68 P. 1006,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1902).

But voluntary intoxication no defense to second degree murder.—

Voluntary intoxication, though producing temporary insanity, is no defense to a charge of murder in the second degree. Gustavenson v. State, 10 Wyo. 300, 68 P. 1006,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1902).

Nor to assault with dangerous weapon. —

Since the crime of assault with a dangerous weapon, defined in § 6-2-502(a), is a general intent crime, voluntary intoxication is not a defense to such crime. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982); Simmons v. State, 674 P.2d 1294,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1984).

The question of the effect of defendant's intoxication upon his ability to form a specific intent was properly submitted to the jury where record included evidence both of intoxication and of sufficient presence of mind. Westwood v. State, 693 P.2d 763,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 426

(Wyo. 1985).

Nor to former offense of drawing dangerous weapon. —

Voluntary intoxication was not a defense to the offense of drawing a dangerous weapon, since that offense was a general intent crime. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

Voluntaryintoxication no defense to indecent liberties with a minor. —

Self-induced intoxication is not a defense to the charge of taking immodest, immoral, or indecent liberties with a minor.
Montez v. State, 2009 WY 17, 201 P.3d 434,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2009).

Jury question. —

If a defendant is to stand on a claim that he, because of drunkenness, could not have intended the consequences of his acts, that fact would first have to be proven to the jury as provided for in this section. Rice v. State, 500 P.2d 675,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1972); Goodman v. State, 573 P.2d 400,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1977).

Lay witness testimony regarding defendant's intoxication. —

In a case where defendant asserted a defense of self-induced intoxication
under this section to the offense of unlawful possession with intent
to deliver, the testimony of two bartenders, including their observations
of defendant and specifically that he was not too intoxicated to be
served alcohol, was helpful to the fact-finder's determination of
whether defendant had the requisite intent to commit the crime; thus,
the trial court did not err in admitting their testimony. Mickelson v. State, 2012 WY 137, 287 P.3d 750,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence of drinking prior to crime's commission insufficientto justify intoxication instruction. —

Evidence that the defendant may have been drinking prior to the commission of an aggravated robbery, but not showing how much he drank, what period of time was involved, or what effect, if any, the drinking had on him, was insufficient to justify the giving of an instruction advising the jury of the effect of intoxication upon the element of specific intent. Naugher v. State, 685 P.2d 37,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1984).

Finding of premeditated malice factually supported. —

Although intoxication may operate as a defense to first-degree murder to the extent that it negates a finding of premeditated malice, where the defendant, at his arraignment, made the statement that he “went drinking and went to kill both of us,” and clearly stated that he intended to kill his ex-wife if she did not agree to resume their relationship, the court's finding that the defendant attempted, with premeditated malice, to kill his former wife was supported by a factual basis. Barron v. State, 819 P.2d 412,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1991).

Failure to instruct on self-induced intoxication. —

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court erred in refusing to give his proposed instruction on self-induced intoxication, since there was competent evidence to support the instruction. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977); Armijo v. State, 678 P.2d 864,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1984); Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984); Matlack v. State, 695 P.2d 635,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo. 1985); Eatherton v. State, 761 P.2d 91,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Downs v. State, 581 P.2d 610,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1978); Poitra v. State, 2012 WY 58, 275 P.3d 478,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Apr. 12, 2012).

Stated

in

Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981); McGinn v. State, 928 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Drugs and Alcohol — Their Effect on Criminal Intent and Responsibility,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 201 (1970).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coercion, compulsion or duress as defense to criminal prosecution, 40 ALR2d 903.

Voluntary intoxication as defense to criminal charge, 8 ALR3d 1236.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — conduct occurring at time of trial regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 78 ALR5th 197.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — pretrial conduct or conduct at unspecified time regarding issues of diminished capacity, intoxication, and unconsciousness, 79 ALR5th 419.

§ 6-1-203.
Battered woman syndrome.

The “battered woman syndrome” is defined as a subset under the diagnosis of Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder established in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders III — Revised of the American Psychiatric Association.

If a person is charged with a crime involving the use of force against another, and the person raises the affirmative defense of self-defense, the person may introduce expert testimony that the person suffered from the syndrome, to establish the necessary requisite belief of an imminent danger of death or great bodily harm as an element of the affirmative defense, to justify the person’s use of force.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 66, § 1.

Applicability. —

Laws 1993, ch. 66, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to all actions pending on or after the effective date of this act.”

Laws 1993, ch. 66, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 1993.

Section does not create separate defense;

it permits the introduction of expert testimony on the battered woman syndrome when the affirmative defense of self-defense is raised. Witt v. State, 892 P.2d 132,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1995).

Applicability of defense. —

Trial court did not err in refusing to admit expert testimony concerning battered woman syndrome, since self-defense was not an appropriate defense in case involving vehicular homicide by reckless conduct. Duran v. State, 990 P.2d 1005,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1999), overruled, Haire v. State, 2017 WY 48, 393 P.3d 1304,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2017).

Testimony on state of mind not permitted. —

The plain language of this section does not permit expert testimony on the ultimate issue of the accused's state of mind at the time the crime was committed. Witt v. State, 892 P.2d 132,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000); Benjamin v. State, 2011 WY 147, — P.3d —,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Oct. 25, 2011).

Stated

in

Trujillo v. State, 953 P.2d 1182,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Chapman v. State, 2001 WY 25, 18 P.3d 1164,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2001); James v. State, 2015 WY 83,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(June 11, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Criminal Law — Wyoming's Battered Woman Syndrome Statute — How Far Can an Expert go to Support a Battered Woman's Self-Defense Claim? Witt v. State, 892 P.2d 132,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water 249 (1996).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

For note, “Criminal Law/Self-Defense — Should a Defendant be Denied the Affirmative Defense of Self Defense if the Criminal Act was not Intentional? Self Defense or Defense for Self? Duran v. State, 990 P.2d 1005,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1999),” see 1 Wyo. L. Rev. 695 (2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Ineffective assistance of counsel: Battered spouse syndrome as defense to homicide or other criminal offense, 11 ALR5th 871.

Admissibility of evidence of battered child syndrome on issue of self-defense, 22 ALR5th 787.

Admissibility of expert or opinion evidence of battered woman syndrome on issue of self-defense, 58 ALR5th 749.

Parents' criminal liability for failure to provide medical attention to their children,118 ALR 5th 253.

§ 6-1-204.
Immunity from civil action for justifiable use of force; attorney fees.

Except as provided by W.S. 6-1-103(a), a person who uses reasonable defensive force pursuant to W.S.

6-2-602

is immune from civil action for the use of the force.

In a civil action filed against a person related to the person’s use of defensive force, the person may file a motion with the court asserting that the person used reasonable defensive force under W.S.

6-2-602

. Upon the filing of the motion the court shall hold a hearing prior to trial and shall grant the person’s motion if he proves by a preponderance of the evidence that he used reasonable defensive force under W.S.

6-2-602

.

A court shall award reasonable attorney fees, court costs, compensation for any loss of income and all other expenses incurred by a person in defense of any civil action arising from the person’s use of reasonable defensive force pursuant to W.S.

6-2-602

if the court finds that the defendant is immune from civil action under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 1; 2018 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “uses reasonable defensive force pursuant to W.S.

6-2-602

is” for “uses force as reasonably necessary in defense of his person, property or abode or to prevent injury to another is”; and added (b) and (c).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 6-1-205.
Limitations on criminal liability for digital expression.

A digital expression that does not otherwise constitute a crime or subject the person responsible for creating the digital expression to criminal liability under the Wyoming Criminal Code shall not serve as the sole basis for any criminal liability based on the use of that digital expression by another person.

Hosting or storing a digital expression on a computer, computer network or computer system in Wyoming in a manner that does not otherwise constitute a crime or subject the person hosting or storing the digital expression to criminal liability under the Wyoming Criminal Code shall not serve as the sole basis for any criminal liability based on the use of that digital expression by another person.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit liability for criminal activity merely because the conduct was in part initiated or carried out by means of a digital expression.

As used in this section:

“Digital expression” means an expression that is communicated through source code or a computer program;

“Computer” means as defined in W.S. 6-3-501(a)(ii);

“Computer network” means as defined in W.S. 6-3-501(a)(iii);

“Computer program” means as defined in W.S. 6-3-501(a)(iv);

“Computer software” mean as defined by W.S. 6-3-501(a)(v);

“Computer system” means as defined in W.S. 6-3-501(a)(vi);

“Source code” means any form of work used to create or modify a computer program. “Source code” includes:

Instructions and statements expressed in a computer programming language;

Computer programming comments, notes and memoranda;

Design documents and functional specifications for a computer program.

History.

2020 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 16, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. March 9, 2020.